Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2463
Judicial proceedings; bond not required.

No bond for costs, appeal, supersedeas, injunction, or attachment shall be required of any agency organized or created pursuant to sections 18-2401 to 18-2485, or of any officer, board, head of any department, agent, or employee of such agency in any proceeding or court action in which the agency or any officer, board, head of department, agent, or employee is a party litigant in its, his, or her official capacity.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 63.